Idaho, session 2025, H0391.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Commission for the Blind and Visually
Impaired $28,900 from the General Fund to be expended for capital outlay for
the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 2. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Office of the Lieutenant Governor
$32,600 from the General Fund to be expended for capital outlay for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Idaho State Lottery $176,700 from the
State Lottery Fund to be expended for capital outlay for the period July 1,
2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 4. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Brand Inspection Division the following
amounts to be expended according to the designated expense classes from the
State Brand Board Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR:
Operating Expenditures $7,200
Capital Outlay 282,000
TOTAL $289,200


SECTION 5. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Commission of Pardons and Parole $12,600
from the General Fund to be expended for operating expenditures for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 6. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Public Utilities Commission the follow-
ing amounts to be expended according to the designated expense classes from
the Public Utilities Commission Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026:
FOR:
Operating Expenditures $5,500
Capital Outlay 108,600
TOTAL $114,100
SECTION 7. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to Idaho Public Television $342,400 from the
General Fund to be expended for capital outlay for the period July 1, 2025,
through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 8. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.